Massachusetts, session 194th, H3110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (e) of section 1 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing 
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the second sentence and replacing it 
with the following sentence:- 
Amounts included in federal gross income pursuant to section 951 of the Code shall be 
treated as dividends under this chapter; provided that amounts included in federal gross income 
pursuant to section 951A of the Code shall not be treated as dividends. 
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of Part B. of section 3 of said chapter 62 of the General 
Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
(20) An amount equal to fifty percent of amounts included in federal gross income 
pursuant to section 951A of the Code. 

of 3 11  SECTION 3. The definition of “Net income” in section 1 of chapter 63 of the General 
Laws, as most recently amended by chapter 273 of the Acts of 2018, is hereby amended by 
striking the sixth sentence and replacing it with the following sentence:- 
For purposes of this definition, amounts included in federal gross income pursuant to 
section 951 of the Code shall be treated as dividends; provided that amounts included in federal 
gross income pursuant to section 951A of the Code shall not be treated as dividends. 
SECTION 4. Said definition of “Net income” in said section 1 of said chapter 63 of the 
General Laws, as so amended, is hereby further amended by striking subsection (g) and replacing 
it with the following subsection:- 
(g) the deductions allowed by sections 245A, 250 and 965(c) of the Code; provided, 
however, that a deduction shall be allowed for an amount equal to fifty percent of amounts 
included in federal gross income pursuant to section 951A of the Code. 
SECTION 5. Section 2A of said chapter 63 of the General Laws, as so amended, is 
hereby amended by striking subsection (h) and replacing it with the following subsection:- 
(h) For purposes of this section, dividends that are deemed to be received from an entity, 
including amounts included in federal gross income pursuant to section 951 of the Code, shall 
not be considered receipts, and amounts included in federal gross income pursuant to section 
951A of the Code also shall not be considered receipts. 
SECTION 6. Paragraph 4 of section 30 of said chapter 63, as so amended, is hereby 
amended by striking the fourth sentence and replacing it with the following sentence:- 

of 3 31  For purposes of this section and subsection (a) of section 38, amounts included in federal 
gross income pursuant to section 951 of the Code shall be treated as dividends; provided that 
amounts included in federal gross income pursuant to section 951A of the Code shall not be 
treated as dividends. 
SECTION 7. Said paragraph 4 of said section 30 of said chapter 63, as so amended, is 
hereby further amended by striking clause (viii) and replacing it with the following clause:- 
(viii) the deductions allowed by sections 245A, 250 and 965(c) of the Code; provided, 
however, that a deduction shall be allowed for an amount equal to fifty percent of amounts 
included in federal gross income pursuant to section 951A of the Code. 
SECTION 8. Subsection (f) of section 38 of said chapter 63, as so amended, is hereby 
amended by inserting, in line 136, after the word “dividends”, the following:- , amounts included 
in federal gross income pursuant to section 951A of the Code, 
SECTION 9. The provisions of this Act shall apply to all tax years beginning on or after 
January 1, 2025.